Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4018
Offense requiring civil commitment evaluation; sentencing court; duties.

When sentencing a person convicted of an offense which requires a civil commitment evaluation pursuant to section 83-174.02, the sentencing court shall:

(1) Provide written notice to the defendant that a civil commitment evaluation is required prior to his or her release from incarceration;

(2) Require the defendant to read and sign a form stating that the defendant has been informed that a civil commitment evaluation is required prior to his or her release from incarceration; and

(3) Retain a copy of the written notification signed by the defendant.

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 55.